third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/bg_BG.aff
SET windows-1251
TRY аеноиртвслкмпздяубъчгцжхшфйщюьАЕНОИРТВСЛКМПЗДЯУБЪЧГЦЖХШФЙЩЮЬ

SFX A Y 8
SFX A   0         а         .
SFX A   0         ата       .
SFX A   0         и         .
SFX A   0         ите       .
SFX A   0         ия        .
SFX A   0         ият       .
SFX A   0         о         .
SFX A   0         ото       .

SFX B Y 3
SFX B   0         и         .
SFX B   0         ите       .
SFX B   0         та        .

SFX C Y 4
SFX C   0         а         .
SFX C   0         и         .
SFX C   0         ите       .
SFX C   0         ът        .

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   0         а         .
SFX D   0         ове       .
SFX D   0         овете     .
SFX D   0         ът        .

SFX E Y 5
SFX E   0         и         .
SFX E   0         ите       .
SFX E   0         ю         .
SFX E   0         я         .
SFX E   0         ят        .

SFX F Y 5
SFX F   0         а         .
SFX F   0         е         .
SFX F   0         и         .
SFX F   0         ите       .
SFX F   0         ът        .

SFX G Y 5
SFX G   0         а         .
SFX G   0         и         .
SFX G   0         ите       .
SFX G   0         о         .
SFX G   0         ът        .

SFX H Y 4
SFX H   0         и         .
SFX H   0         ите       .
SFX H   0         я         .
SFX H   0         ят        .

SFX I Y 2
SFX I   0         а         .
SFX I   0         ът        .

SFX J Y 3
SFX J   0         та        .
SFX J   0         тата      .
SFX J   0         то        .

SFX K Y 25
SFX K   а         ата       а
SFX K   а         и         а
SFX K   а         ите       а
SFX K   г         га        г
SFX K   г         гът       г
SFX K   г         зи        г
SFX K   г         зите      г
SFX K   ен        на        ен
SFX K   ен        ната      ен
SFX K   ен        ни        ен
SFX K   ен        ните      ен
SFX K   ен        ния       ен
SFX K   ен        ният      ен
SFX K   ен        но        ен
SFX K   ен        ното      ен
SFX K   и         а         и
SFX K   и         ата       и
SFX K   и         ите       и
SFX K   и         ия        и
SFX K   и         ият       и
SFX K   и         о         и
SFX K   и         ото       и
SFX K   я         и         я
SFX K   я         ите       я
SFX K   я         ята       я

SFX L Y 133
SFX L   а         ата       а
SFX L   а         и         а
SFX L   а         ите       а
SFX L   е         ето       е
SFX L   ен        йна       ен
SFX L   ен        йната     ен
SFX L   ен        йни       ен
SFX L   ен        йните     ен
SFX L   ен        йния      ен
SFX L   ен        йният     ен
SFX L   ен        йно       ен
SFX L   ен        йното     ен
SFX L   ец        еца       ец
SFX L   ец        ецо       ец
SFX L   ец        ецът      ец
SFX L   ец        ци        ец
SFX L   ец        ците      ец
SFX L   е         я         е
SFX L   е         ята       е
SFX L   и         а         и
SFX L   и         ата       и
SFX L   и         ите       и
SFX L   и         ия        и
SFX L   и         ият       и
SFX L   и         о         и
SFX L   и         ото       и
SFX L   о         а         о
SFX L   о         ата       о
SFX L   о         ото       о
SFX L   ъв        ва        ъв
SFX L   ъв        вата      ъв
SFX L   ъв        ви        ъв
SFX L   ъв        вите      ъв
SFX L   ъв        вия       ъв
SFX L   ъв        вият      ъв
SFX L   ъв        во        ъв
SFX L   ъв        вото      ъв
SFX L   ъг        га        ъг
SFX L   ъг        гата      ъг
SFX L   ъг        ги        ъг
SFX L   ъг        гите      ъг
SFX L   ъг        гия       ъг
SFX L   ъг        гият      ъг
SFX L   ъг        го        ъг
SFX L   ъг        гото      ъг
SFX L   ък        ка        ък
SFX L   ък        ката      ък
SFX L   ък        ки        ък
SFX L   ък        ките      ък
SFX L   ък        кия       ък
SFX L   ък        кият      ък
SFX L   ък        ко        ък
SFX L   ък        кото      ък
SFX L   ъл        ла        ъл
SFX L   ъл        лата      ъл
SFX L   ъл        ли        ъл
SFX L   ъл        лите      ъл
SFX L   ъл        лия       ъл
SFX L   ъл        лият      ъл
SFX L   ъл        ло        ъл
SFX L   ъл        лото      ъл
SFX L   ър        ра        ър
SFX L   ър        рата      ър
SFX L   ър        ри        ър
SFX L   ър        рите      ър
SFX L   ър        рия       ър
SFX L   ър        рият      ър
SFX L   ър        ро        ър
SFX L   ър        рото      ър
SFX L   ъш        ша        ъш
SFX L   ъш        шата      ъш
SFX L   ъш        ши        ъш
SFX L   ъш        шите      ъш
SFX L   ъш        шия       ъш
SFX L   ъш        шият      ъш
SFX L   ъш        шо        ъш
SFX L   ъш        шото      ъш
SFX L   яв        еви       яв
SFX L   яв        евите     яв
SFX L   яв        евия      яв
SFX L   яв        евият     яв
SFX L   яв        ява       яв
SFX L   яв        явата     яв
SFX L   яв        яво       яв
SFX L   яв        явото     яв
SFX L   як        еки       як
SFX L   як        еките     як
SFX L   як        екия      як
SFX L   як        екият     як
SFX L   як        яка       як
SFX L   як        яката     як
SFX L   як        яко       як
SFX L   як        якото     як
SFX L   ял        ели       ял
SFX L   ял        елите     ял
SFX L   ял        елия      ял
SFX L   ял        елият     ял
SFX L   ял        яла       ял
SFX L   ял        ялата     ял
SFX L   ял        яло       ял
SFX L   ял        ялото     ял
SFX L   ям        еми       ям
SFX L   ям        емите     ям
SFX L   ям        емия      ям
SFX L   ям        емият     ям
SFX L   ям        яма       ям
SFX L   ям        ямата     ям
SFX L   ям        ямо       ям
SFX L   ям        ямото     ям
SFX L   ян        ени       ян
SFX L   ян        ените     ян
SFX L   ян        ения      ян
SFX L   ян        еният     ян
SFX L   ян        яна       ян
SFX L   ян        яната     ян
SFX L   ян        яно       ян
SFX L   ян        яното     ян
SFX L   яп        епи       яп
SFX L   яп        епите     яп
SFX L   яп        епия      яп
SFX L   яп        епият     яп
SFX L   яп        япа       яп
SFX L   яп        япата     яп
SFX L   яп        япо       яп
SFX L   яп        япото     яп
SFX L   ят        ети       ят
SFX L   ят        етите     ят
SFX L   ят        етия      ят
SFX L   ят        етият     ят
SFX L   ят        ята       ят
SFX L   ят        ятата     ят
SFX L   ят        ято       ят
SFX L   ят        ятото     ят

SFX M Y 29
SFX M   е         а         е
SFX M   е         ата       е
SFX M   е         ето       е
SFX M   ец        еца       ец
SFX M   ец        ецо       ец
SFX M   ец        ецът      ец
SFX M   ец        йци       ец
SFX M   ец        йците     ец
SFX M   ин        и         ин
SFX M   ин        ина       ин
SFX M   ин        ино       ин
SFX M   ин        инът      ин
SFX M   ин        ите       ин
SFX M   й         и         й
SFX M   й         ите       й
SFX M   й         ю         й
SFX M   й         я         й
SFX M   й         ят        й
SFX M   о         и         о
SFX M   о         ите       о
SFX M   о         ото       о
SFX M   ъм        ма        ъм
SFX M   ъм        ми        ъм
SFX M   ъм        мите      ъм
SFX M   ъм        мът       ъм
SFX M   ъм        ъма       ъм
SFX M   я         и         я
SFX M   я         ите       я
SFX M   я         ята       я

SFX N Y 20
SFX N   ел        ела       ел
SFX N   ел        елът      ел
SFX N   ел        ли        ел
SFX N   ел        лите      ел
SFX N   ец        еца       ец
SFX N   ец        ецът      ец
SFX N   ец        ци        ец
SFX N   ец        ците      ец
SFX N   ъл        ли        ъл
SFX N   ъл        лите      ъл
SFX N   ъл        ъла       ъл
SFX N   ъл        ълът      ъл
SFX N   ъм        ми        ъм
SFX N   ъм        мите      ъм
SFX N   ъм        ъма       ъм
SFX N   ъм        ъмът      ъм
SFX N   ър        ри        ър
SFX N   ър        рите      ър
SFX N   ър        ъра       ър
SFX N   ър        ърът      ър
